Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-331.02
Handicapped or disabled person,
defined.

Handicapped
or disabled person means any individual with a severe visual or physical impairment
which limits personal mobility and results in an inability to travel unassisted
more than two hundred feet without the use of a wheelchair, crutch, walker,
or prosthetic, orthotic, or other assistant device, any individual whose personal
mobility is limited as a result of respiratory problems, any individual who
has a cardiac condition to the extent that his or her functional limitations
are classified in severity as being Class III or Class IV, according to standards
set by the American Heart Association, and any individual who has permanently
lost all or substantially all the use of one or more limbs.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 20.